Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2885.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. State projects, cultural impact assessment; civil penalty; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, this state or an agency of this state shall perform a CULTURAL impact assessment for all state projects before the state project may begin. B. If a contractor working on a state project ignores the findings of the cultural impact ASSESSMENT pursuant to subsection A of this section and begins the project, The contractor shall be assessed a civil penalty of $1,500. C. For the purposes of this section, "cultural impact assessment" means a process to identify, evaluate and manage the effects of a proposed project on a community's cultural values, resources and heritage. END_STATUTE